Mississippi statutes. Title 71. Labor and Industry
Drug-Free workplace Workers’ Compensation Premium Reduction Act

§ 71-3-201.
Title.

Sections 71-3-201 through 71-3-225 shall be known and may be cited as the “Drug-Free Workplace Workers’ Compensation Premium Reduction Act.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 455, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 71-3-203.
Legislative Intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature to promote drug-free workplaces in order that employers in this state be afforded the opportunity to maximize their levels of productivity, enhance their competitive positions in the marketplace, and reach their desired levels of success without experiencing the costs, delays and tragedies associated with work-related accidents resulting from substance abuse by employees.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 455, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 71-3-205.
Definitions.

The following words and terms in Sections 71-3-201 through 71-3-225 shall have meanings as follows:

“Employee” means any person who works for salary, wages or other remuneration for an employer.

“Employer” means a person or entity that is subject to the Mississippi Workers’ Compensation Law as found in Section 71-3-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 455, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 71-3-207.
Implementation of drug-free workplace program; qualification of employer of premium reduction.

If an employer implements a drug-free workplace program substantially in accordance with Sections 71-3-201 through 71-3-225, the employer shall qualify for certification for a five percent (5%) premium discount if offered under the employer’s workers’ compensation insurance policy.

For each policy of workers’ compensation insurance issued or renewed in the state on or after July 1, 1997, a five percent (5%) reduction in the premium for such policy may be granted by the insurer if the insured certifies to the insurer that it has established and maintains a drug-free workplace program that complies with the requirements of Sections 71-3-201 through 71-3-225.

The premium discount provided by this section shall be applied to an insured’s workers’ compensation insurance pro rata as of the date of receipt of certification by the insurer.

The Workers’ Compensation Commission shall promulgate appropriate forms and procedures to allow self-certification by an insured to its insurer. Certification by an insured shall be required for each year in which a premium discount is granted.

The insured’s workers’ compensation insurance policy shall be subject to an additional premium for the purposes of reimbursement of a previously granted premium discount if it is determined that such insured misrepresented the compliance of its drug-free workplace program within the provisions of Sections 71-3-201 through 71-3-225.

The Workers’ Compensation Commission shall be authorized to promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the implementation and enforcement of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 455, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 71-3-209.
Elements of drug-free workplace program.

A drug-free workplace program must contain the following elements:

Written policy statement as provided in Section 71-3-211;

Comply with the substance abuse testing procedures as provided in Sections 71-7-1 through 71-7-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, if testing is initiated by the employer;

Resources of employee assistance providers or other rehabilitation resources, maintained in accordance with Section 71-3-213;

Employee education as provided in Section 71-3-215; and

Supervisor training in accordance with Section 71-3-217.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 455, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 71-3-211.
Employer’s written policy statement on substance abuse.

A drug-free workplace must provide a written policy statement on substance abuse in order to qualify for the provisions of Section 71-3-207. All employees must be given a written policy statement from the employer that contains:

A general statement of the employer’s policy on substance abuse notifying employees that the unlawful manufacture, sale, distribution, solicitation, possession with intent to sell or distribute, or use of alcohol or other drugs is prohibited in the person’s workplace;

A statement advising an employee or job applicant of the existence of Sections 71-3-201 through 71-3-225;

A general statement concerning confidentiality;

A statement advising an employee of the employee assistance program, external employee assistance program, or the employer’s resource file of employee assistance programs and other persons, entities or organizations designed to assist employees with personal or behavioral problems;

A statement informing an employee of the provisions of the federal Drug-Free Workplace Act if applicable to the employer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 455, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 71-3-213.
Qualification as private sector drug-free workplace.

In order for an employer’s workplace to qualify as a private sector drug-free workplace and to qualify for the provisions of Section 71-3-207, the following must be met:

If an employer has an employee assistance program, the employer must inform the employee of the benefits and services of the employee assistance program. An employer shall post notice of the employee assistance program in conspicuous places and explore alternatives to publicize such services. In addition, the employer must provide the employee with notice of the policies and procedures regarding access to and utilization of the program.

If an employer does not have an employee assistance program, the employer must maintain a resource file of employee assistance service providers, alcohol and other drug abuse programs, mental health providers, and other persons, entities or organizations available to assist employees with personal or behavioral problems. The employer shall provide all employees information about the existence of the resource file and a summary of the information contained within the resource file. The summary should contain, but need not be limited to, all information necessary to access the services listed in the resource file. In addition, the employer shall post in conspicuous places a listing of multiple employee assistance providers in the area.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 455, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 71-3-215.
Education program on alcohol and drug abuse.

An employer must provide all employees with an education program on alcohol and other drug abuse prior to instituting a private sector drug-free workplace program under Sections 71-3-201 through 71-3-225. Also, an employer must provide all employees with an annual education program on alcohol and other drug abuse, in general, and its effects on the workplace, specifically. An education program for a minimum of one (1) hour should include, but is not limited to, the following information:

The explanation of the disease of addiction for alcohol and other drugs;

The effects and dangers of the commonly abused substances in the workplace; and

The company’s policies and procedures regarding alcohol and other drug use or abuse in the workplace and how employees who wish to obtain substance abuse treatment can do so.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 455, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 71-3-217.
Training of supervisory personnel.

In order to qualify as a private sector drug-free workplace and to qualify for the provisions of Section 71-3-207, and in addition to the educational program provided in Section 71-3-215, an employer must provide all supervisory personnel a minimum of two (2) hours of training prior to the institution of a drug-free workplace program under Sections 71-3-201 through 71-3-225, and each year thereafter which should include, but is not limited to, the following:

Recognition of evidence of employee alcohol and other drug abuse;

Documentation and corroboration of employee alcohol and other drug abuse;

Referral of alcohol and other drug abusing employees to the proper treatment providers;

Recognition of the benefits of referring alcohol and other drug abusing employees to treatment programs, in terms of employee health and safety and company savings; and

Explanation of any employee health insurance of HMO coverage for alcohol and other drug problems.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 455, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 71-3-219.
Confidentiality of results of substance abuse program.

All information, interview, reports, statements, memoranda and test results, written or otherwise, received by the employer through a substance abuse program are confidential communications as they pertain to the employee only and may not be used or received in evidence, obtained in discovery or disclosed in any public or private proceedings, except as provided in Sections 71-7-1 through 71-7-33, Mississippi Code of 1972.

Release of any such information under any other circumstance shall be solely pursuant to a written consent form signed voluntarily by the person tested, unless such release is compelled by an agency of the state or a court of competent jurisdiction or unless deemed appropriate by a professional or occupational licensing board in a related disciplinary proceeding. The consent form must contain at a minimum:

The name of the person who is authorized to obtain the information;

The purpose of the disclosure;

The precise information to be disclosed;

The duration of the consent; and

The signature of the person authorizing release of the information.

Nothing in Sections 71-3-201 through 71-3-225 shall be construed to call for actions that may violate federal or state confidentiality statutes for employee assistance professionals and alcohol and other drug abuse counseling or treatment providers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 455, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 71-3-221.
Failure of employer to establish substance abuse program.

No cause of action shall arise in favor of any person against an employer based upon the failure of an employer to establish a substance abuse program in accordance with Sections 71-3-201 through 71-3-225.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 455, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 71-3-223.
Relation to other laws.

Nothing in Sections 71-3-201 through 71-3-225 shall be construed to operate retroactively, and nothing in Sections 71-3-201 through 71-3-225 shall abrogate the right of an employer under state law to conduct substance abuse tests, or implement employee substance abuse testing programs. Only those programs that meet the criteria outlined in Sections 71-3-201 through 71-3-225 qualify for reduced workers’ compensation insurance rates under Section 71-3-207.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 455, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 71-3-225.
Severability.

If any provision of Sections 71-3-201 through 71-3-225 or application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of Sections 71-3-201 through 71-3-225 that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of Sections 71-3-201 through 71-3-225 are severable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 455, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1997.